Utah statutes.
6-1-11.   Court to supervise administration.
The assignee shall at all times be subject to the order and supervision of the
court or judge and from time to time may be compelled, by citation or
attachment, to file reports of his proceedings and of the situation and
condition of the trust, and to proceed in the execution of the duties required
by this title.
